District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.36d

Future legal requirements.

The issuance of TIF Bonds to finance the Project and the terms of the resolution approving the issuance of the TIF Bonds are subject to approval by the Council as set forth in the TIF Act. Enactment of this subpart in no way guarantees that the District will authorize the issue of TIF Bonds in any amount, that the TIF Bonds will be approved by the District, or that the TIF Bonds will actually be issued.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7195, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7165 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).